Oklahoma, session 2026, SB168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 53 of Title 61, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Manufactured or produced in the United States” means a


product that has all manufacturing processes occurring in the United


States. All components of the product must be of United States


origin. A component is considered to be a product of United States


origin if all of its manufacturing processes occur in the United


States, notwithstanding the origin of it subcomponents; and



Req. No. 283 Page 1


2. “Public building or public work” means any structure,


building, highway, waterway, street, bridge, transit system,


airport, or other betterment, work, or improvement, whether of a


permanent or temporary nature and whether for governmental or


proprietary use. The term includes, but is not limited to, any


railway, street railway, subway, elevated and passenger and rail


rolling stock, self-propelled cars, gallery cars, locomotives,


passenger buses, wires, poles and equipment for electrification of a


transit system, rails, tracks, roadbeds, guideways, elevated


structures, buildings, schools, hospitals, stations, terminals,


docks, shelters, and repairs to any such public building or public


work.


B. Any agency or entity of this state, or any person making


purchases on behalf of such agency or entity, shall require any


contract for the construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair,


improvement, or maintenance of a public building or public work with


an estimated contract price exceeding One Hundred Thousand Dollars


($100,000.00), to state that all iron, steel, and aluminum to be


used in the completion of such contract shall be manufactured or


produced in the United States. All solicitation documents for such


contracts shall clearly state such requirement. Any bid or proposal


that does not affirmatively attest that the bidder read and


understood such requirement shall not be considered by the agency or



Req. No. 283 Page 2


entity, or person making purchases on behalf of such agency or


entity.


C. An agency or entity of this state may submit a written


appeal to the State Purchasing Director to exempt a contract from


the requirements of subsection B of this section. The appeal shall


include information demonstrating that:


1. Such requirements are inconsistent with the public interest;


2. A particular material to be used in the completion of the


contract is not produced or manufactured in the United States in


sufficient and reasonably available quantities and with satisfactory


quality; or


3. Using materials produced or manufactured in the United


States shall increase the cost of construction, reconstruction,


alteration, repair, improvement, or maintenance of a public building


or public work by more than twenty-five percent (25%).


The State Purchasing Director shall give public notice of the


appeal upon its receipt in a manner that the State Purchasing


Director determines shall give adequate notice to the public and to


individuals, firms, or corporations that intend to submit or have


submitted bids or proposals for such contracts for public buildings


or public works. The State Purchasing Director shall allow seven


(7) calendar days for public comment on the appeal. If after the


public comment period the State Purchasing Director authorizes the


exemption of a contract from the requirements of subsection B of

Req. No. 283 Page 3


this section, he or she shall provide public notice of the


authorization in the same method used to provide public notice of


the appeal.


D. A state agency or entity shall notify the State Purchasing


Director if it suspects an individual, firm, or corporation is


intentionally violating the requirements of subsection B of this


section. If the State Purchasing Director determines after a review


of the contract and the actions of the individual, firm, or


corporation that an intentional violation has taken place, the


individual, firm, or corporation shall be ineligible to, and shall


not, bid on a state contract for a period of five (5) years. Such


individual, firm, or corporation shall have the right to appeal the


decision of the State Purchasing Director to a court of competent


jurisdiction.


E. The provisions of this section shall not apply if a


reciprocal trade agreement or treaty has been negotiated by this


state or by the United States on behalf of or including this state


with a foreign nation or government for nondiscriminatory


governmental procurement practices or policies with such foreign


nation or government.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-283 RD 12/30/2024 12:30:09 PM



Req. No. 283 Page 4